Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 3

Revenue Bonds

9-21-301. Authorization for the issuance of revenue bonds.

Any local government is authorized to issue revenue bonds under this part and part 1 of this chapter for a public works project. “Revenue bonds” are defined as those bonds which are payable exclusively from the revenues of one (1) or more public works projects.

The bonds may be sold in such blocks as the governing body may by resolution determine.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 3-1.

9-21-302. Sale of revenue bonds — Agreements regarding dates of delivery.

Any local government proposing to sell revenue bonds under this part and part 1 of this chapter is authorized to sell such bonds either at a competitive public sale or at a private negotiated sale as the governing body of the local government may direct.

The governing body of a local government may enter into an agreement to sell its revenue bonds under this part providing for delivery of its bonds on a date greater than ninety (90) days and not greater than five (5) years (or such greater period of time if approved by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee) from the date of execution of such agreement only upon receipt of a report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee finding that such an agreement or contract of a local government to sell its revenue bonds as authorized in this subsection (b) is in compliance with the guidelines, rules or regulations adopted or promulgated by the state funding board in accordance with § 9-21-130. Agreements to sell revenue bonds for delivery ninety (90) days or less from the date of execution of the agreement to sell the revenue bonds do not require a report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 3-2; 1999, ch. 432, § 4.

9-21-303. Sale of revenue bonds at below par value.

All revenue bonds issued by any local government under the authority of this part and part 1 of this chapter shall be sold for not less than ninety-seven percent (97%) of par value and accrued interest as the governing body of the local government may direct. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent the sale of particular bonds constituting a part of a single issue or series of bonds at a price below that herein specified, as long as the total price paid by the purchaser for the entire issue or series of bonds offered for sale on any given date is not less than ninety-seven percent (97%) of the par value of the entire issue or series of bonds and accrued interest; provided, that if any part of such issue or series of such revenue bonds is to be sold at a zero (0) rate of interest or at an original issue discount, such bonds may be sold at less than ninety-seven percent (97%) of the original reoffering price of such discount bonds and accrued interest.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 3-3.

9-21-304. Initial revenue bond resolution.

Prior to the issuance of any revenue bonds pursuant to this part and part 1 of this chapter, the governing body of the local government shall adopt a resolution (herein referred to as the “initial resolution”) determining to issue the revenue bonds.

The initial resolution shall state in substance:

The amount or maximum amount of revenue bonds to be issued;

The public works project or projects for which the revenue bonds are to be issued, but if the bonds are to be issued for more than one (1) project, the initial resolution need not state the amount which will be used for each project;

The rate or maximum rate of interest which the revenue bonds are to bear; and

A brief concise statement that the revenue bonds will be payable exclusively from revenues of the public works project or projects.

The initial resolution shall be published in full once in a newspaper of general circulation in the local government.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 3-4; 1988, ch. 750, § 43.

9-21-305. Terms of revenue bonds.

The revenue bonds may be sold in one (1) or more series, may bear such date or dates, shall mature at such time or times, not exceeding forty (40) years from their respective dates, may bear interest at a zero (0) rate or at such other rate or rates (which may vary from time to time), may be payable at such time or times, may be in such denomination or denominations, may be in such form, either coupon or registered, may carry such registration and conversion privileges, may be executed in such manner, may be payable in such medium of payment at such place or places, may be subject to such terms of redemption, with or without premium, and may provide for the replacement of mutilated, destroyed, stolen, or lost bonds, all as may be provided by resolution of the governing body of the local government. The term of the revenue bonds shall not exceed the reasonably expected economic life of the project being financed with such bonds, as stated in the resolution authorizing the revenue bonds. An erroneous estimate of the reasonably expected economic life of the project shall in no way affect the validity of such bonds.

A revenue bond issue may be delivered as an installment bond payable as to principal and interest in equal or approximately equal installments for the term of the bond issue in accordance with the resolution authorizing the bond issue. The authorizing resolution shall stipulate the annual principal and interest requirements during the full term of the installment bond issue.

With respect to all or any portion of any issue of revenue bonds issued or anticipated to be issued hereunder, at any time during the term of the revenue bonds, and upon receipt of a report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee finding that the contracts and agreements authorized herein are in compliance with the guidelines, rules or regulations adopted or promulgated by the state funding board, as set forth in § 9-21-130, a local government by resolution may authorize and enter into interest rate swap or exchange agreements, agreements establishing interest rate floors or ceilings or both, and other interest rate hedging agreements under such terms and conditions as the governing body of the local government may determine, including, without limitation, provisions permitting the local government to pay to or receive from any person or entity any loss of benefits under such agreement upon early termination thereof or default under such agreement.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 3-5; 1999, ch. 432, § 5.

9-21-306. Powers to secure and to covenant as to revenue bonds.

In order to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on revenue bonds issued pursuant to this part and part 1 of this chapter, and the payment of the obligations of any local government under any interest rate agreement authorized by this part, including its obligation for termination or other non-periodic payments, or in connection with such bonds or interest rate agreements, any local government has the power as to such bonds or interest rate agreements to:

Pledge all or any part of the fees, rents, tolls, or other charges received or receivable by the local government from any public works project or projects then existing or thereafter to be constructed, including any revenues derived or to be derived by a local government from a lease, agreement or contract with any other local government, local government instrumentality, the state, or a state or federal agency for the use of or in connection with such public works project or projects, to the punctual payment of the principal of and interest on bonds issued to finance such public works project or projects, or any other public works project or projects, and the payment of the obligations of any local government under any interest rate agreement authorized by this part, and covenant against thereafter pledging any such fees, rents, tolls, or charges to any other bonds or any other obligations of the local government;

Covenant as to the fees, rents or tolls to be charged in connection with any public works project or projects and as to the use and disposition to be made thereof, and enter into appropriate agreements with any other local government, local government instrumentality, the state, or a state or federal agency for such purpose with respect to a public works project which is to be owned or leased by a local government or local government instrumentality;

Provide for the terms, forms, registration, exchange, execution and authentication of the revenue bonds in a manner not inconsistent with this part and part 1 of this chapter;

Covenant as to the use and disposition of the proceeds from the sale of the revenue bonds in a manner not inconsistent with this part and part 1 of this chapter;

Covenant as to limitations on the issuance of additional obligations to finance the improving of the public works project and on the lien thereof;

Covenant as to the amount and kind of insurance to be maintained on the public works project, and the use and disposition of insurance moneys;

Covenant as to the transfer from the general funds of the local government to the account or accounts of the public works project, an amount equal to the cost of furnishing the local government or any of its departments, boards or agencies with the services, facilities, and commodities of the public works project;

Covenant as to the operation and maintenance of the public works project;

Covenant to set aside or pay over reserves and sinking funds for the revenue bonds and as to the disposition thereof;

Redeem the revenue bonds, and covenant for their redemption and to provide the terms and conditions thereof;

Covenant as to its books of account, as to the inspection and audit thereof, and as to the accounting methods; provided, that an audit of the books and accounts of the local government shall be made at least annually in accordance with §§ 4-3-304 and 6-56-105. All audits shall be performed in accordance with the standards established by the comptroller of the treasury;

Covenant and prescribe as to what occurrences shall constitute “events of default” and the terms and conditions upon which any or all of the revenue bonds shall become or may be declared due before maturity and as to the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived;

Covenant as to the rights, remedies, liabilities, powers and duties arising upon the breach by it of any covenant, condition or obligation;

Execute all instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers herein granted or in the performance of its covenants or duties;

Make such covenants and do any and all such acts and things as may be necessary or convenient or desirable in order to secure the revenue bonds, or in the discretion of the governing body, to make the revenue bonds more marketable, notwithstanding that such covenants, acts or things may not be enumerated herein; it being the purpose hereof to give the local government power to do all things in the issuance of the revenue bonds and for their security that may be consistent with the Constitution of Tennessee;

Pledge all or any part of the then unpledged rates, fees, rents or other charges to be received from its waterworks system to the punctual payment of the principal of and interest on any sewer bonds for the construction of facilities for the collection, treatment and disposal of sewage and waste matter, including all property, real and personal, appurtenant thereto or in connection therewith, which pledge may be in addition to a pledge of rates, fees, rents and charges received or receivable from any sewer system then existing or to be constructed;

Covenant that it will fix, levy and collect fees, rents, tolls or other charges for the privilege of parking motor vehicles in the space immediately adjacent to any parking meter which in its discretion, it may install and operate and maintain beside specified portions of the public streets;

Covenant that the costs of operating and maintaining parking facilities payable from the revenues of such parking facilities shall not include all or any part of the salaries of police officers employed in the enforcement of on-street parking regulations;

Vest in a trustee or trustees powers and duties, including the right to enforce any covenants made to secure, or to pay, the revenue bonds, limitations on liabilities, and the terms and conditions upon which the holders of the revenue bonds or any portion or percentage of them may enforce any covenants thereunder or duties imposed thereby;

Prescribe a procedure by which the terms of any resolution authorizing revenue bonds, or any other contract with bondholders, including, but not limited to, an indenture of trust or similar instrument, may be amended or abrogated and as to the amount of revenue bonds the holders of which must consent thereto and the manner in which such consent must be given; and

Covenant and provide for the discharge and satisfaction and defeasance of all or any part of revenue bonds and the indebtedness evidenced thereby.

This section shall apply to any governmental entity created by private act that has the power to issue revenue bonds and to enter into interest rate agreement of the type authorized by this part.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 3-6; 2004, ch. 589, § 1.

9-21-307. Revenue bonds of the same issue shall be equally and ratably secured.

All revenue bonds of the same issue shall be equally and ratably secured, without priority by reason of number, date of bonds, date of sale, date of execution, or of delivery, by a lien upon the revenues of the public works project or projects, the revenues of which are pledged to the payment of such bonds, in accordance with this part and the resolution authorizing the issuance of the revenue bonds.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 3-7.

9-21-308. Rates, fees or charges — Collection, revision and disposition.

The governing body of a local government issuing revenue bonds pursuant to this part and part 1 of this chapter shall prescribe and collect reasonable rates, fees or charges for the services, facilities and commodities of the public works project or projects, and shall revise such rates, fees, or charges from time to time whenever necessary so that the public works project or projects shall be and always remain self-supporting. The rates, fees or charges prescribed shall be at least sufficient to produce revenue to:

Provide for all expenses of operation and maintenance of the public works project or projects, including reasonable reserves therefor; and

Pay when due all bonds and notes and interest thereon, for the payment of which such revenue is or shall have been pledged, charged or otherwise encumbered, including reasonable reserves therefor.

If the governing body of the local government shall by resolution so request, the revenues produced from the rates, fees or charges prescribed may, after providing for payments referred to in subsection (a), be applied to payments to the local government in lieu of ad valorem taxes on the property of the public works project or projects not to exceed the amount of taxes payable on privately owned property of a similar nature.

Rates, fees and charges shall be made for any service, facility, and commodity of any public works project to a local government or to any department or works thereof at the rate applicable to other customers taking service under similar conditions. Revenues derived from such service shall be treated as all other revenues.

Any surplus thereafter remaining, after establishment of proper reserves, if any, may be applied to the acquisition, extension, and/or improvement of the public works project or projects or may be applied to the reduction of rates in the case of a public works project that provides water, sewer, gas, or electric services.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, as a matter of public policy, public works projects financed under this chapter shall be operated on sound business principles as self-sufficient entities. User charges, rates and fees shall reflect the actual cost of providing the services rendered. Public works shall not operate for gain or profit or as a source of revenue to a government entity, but shall operate for the use and benefit of the customers served by such public works and for the improvement of the health and safety of the inhabitants of the area served. Nothing herein shall preclude a municipal utility system from operating water and sewer systems as individual or combined entities. Nothing herein shall preclude a municipal utility system from operating a public works system as a special revenue fund when the governing body of the municipality determines that it is in the best interest of the customers of the public works system and the citizens of the municipality. All water systems and wastewater facilities must utilize an enterprise fund for accounting and reporting its operations. Any water system or wastewater facility currently not operating as an enterprise fund must be doing so by July 1, 2016. To the extent of any conflict between this section and the Wastewater Facilities Act of 1987, compiled in title 68, chapter 221, part 10, the latter statute shall control.

To the extent of any conflict between this section and § 7-39-404, § 7-34-115, or title 7, chapter 52, part 3, the latter statutes shall control.

If a municipality violates this section, it must repay any funds illegally transferred. If the municipality does not have sufficient funds to repay any funds illegally transferred, the municipality is required to submit a plan covering a period not to exceed five (5) years in which to repay the funds. The plan shall be submitted to and approved by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee. Upon discovery of such violation through an audit, any city official in violation of this section is subject to ouster under title 8, chapter 47.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 3-8; 1987, ch. 77, § 5; 1988, ch. 750, § 45; 1993, ch. 509, §§ 2-4; 2010, ch. 868, § 47; 2014, ch. 628, §§ 11, 12.

Attorney General Opinions. Municipal authority to charge residents never connected to water system, OAG 98-152, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 152 (8/12/98).

9-21-309. Recourse restricted to revenues.

No recourse shall be had for the payment of the revenue bonds, or interest thereon, or any part thereof, against the general funds of any local government, nor shall the full faith and credit or taxing power of any local government be deemed to be pledged to the payment of the revenue bonds.

The revenue bonds, and interest thereon, shall not be a debt of the local government, nor a charge, lien or encumbrance, legal or equitable, upon any property of the local government or upon any income, receipts or revenues of the local government other than the revenues that shall have been pledged to the payment of the revenue bonds. Every revenue bond shall recite in substance that the bond, including interest thereon, is payable solely from the revenues pledged to the payment thereof and that the local government is under no obligation to pay the same, except from those revenues.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 3-9.

9-21-310. Remedies of revenue bondholders.

Subject to any contractual limitations binding upon the holders of any issue of revenue bonds, or trustee therefor, including, but not limited to, the restriction of the exercise of any remedy to a specified proportion or percentage of such holders, any holder of revenue bonds, or trustee therefor, shall have the right and power, for the equal benefit and protection of all holders of revenue bonds similarly situated and, in addition to all other rights:

By mandamus or other suit, action or proceeding at law or in equity, to enforce such rights against the local government and its governing body and any of its officers, agents and employees and to require and compel the local government or the governing body or its officers, agents or employees to perform and carry out its and their duties and obligations under this part and part 1 of this chapter and its and their covenants and agreements with revenue bondholders;

By action or suit in equity, to require the local government and the governing body thereof to account as if they were the trustee of an express trust;

By action or by suit in equity, to enjoin any acts or things which may be unlawful or in violation of the rights of the revenue bondholders; and

To bring suit upon the revenue bonds.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 3-10.

9-21-311. Appointment of receiver on default.

In the event that the local government shall default in the payment of the principal of or interest on any of the revenue bonds after the same shall become due, whether at maturity or upon call for redemption, and the default shall continue for a period of thirty (30) days, or in the event that the local government or the governing body or its officers, agents or employees shall fail or refuse to comply with this chapter or shall default in any agreement made with the holders of the revenue bonds, then any holder of revenue bonds, or trustee therefor, shall have the right to file a petition in the nature of a general creditor's bill in the chancery court of the county in which the public works project is situated, or if the public works project is situated in more than one (1) county, in the chancery court of any county in which any portion of the public works project is situated, or in any court of competent jurisdiction, for the appointment of a receiver of the public works project. The petition may be filed whether or not all the revenue bonds have been declared due and payable and whether or not the holder or holders or trustee therefor is seeking or has sought to enforce any other right, or exercise any remedy in connection with the revenue bonds.

Upon application, the chancery court may appoint a receiver of the public works project. The chancery court shall appoint a receiver of the public works project if the application is made by the holders of twenty-five percent (25%) in principal amount of the revenue bonds then outstanding or by any trustee for holders of the revenue bonds in that principal amount.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 3-11.

9-21-312. Judicial supervision of receiver.

The receiver shall, in the performance of the powers conferred upon such receiver, act under the direction and supervision of the court making the appointment, and shall at all times be subject to the orders and decrees of the court, and may be removed by the court. Nothing contained in this chapter shall limit or restrict the jurisdiction of the court to enter such other and further orders and decrees as the court may deem necessary or appropriate for the exercise by the receiver of any functions specifically set forth in this part.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 3-12.

9-21-313. Duties of receiver.

It is the duty of a receiver to:

Immediately, either directly or through agents and attorneys, enter and take possession of each and every part of the public works project;

Have, hold, use, operate, manage and control the public works project in the name of the local government or otherwise, as the receiver may deem best;

Exercise all the rights and powers of the local government with respect to the public works project which the local government itself might exercise;

Maintain, restore, insure and keep insured the public works project and from time to time shall make all necessary or proper repairs as the receiver may deem expedient;

Establish, levy, maintain and collect such fees, tolls, rentals, and other charges in connection with the public works project as the receiver may, subject to approval of the court, deem necessary or proper and reasonable; and

Deposit the revenues in a separate account and apply the revenues so collected and received in such manner as the court shall direct.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 3-13.

9-21-314. Sale of assets by receiver prohibited.

Notwithstanding §9-21-313, the receiver shall have no power to sell, assign, mortgage or otherwise dispose of any assets of whatever kind or character belonging to the local government or any local government instrumentality and useful for the public works project. The authority of any receiver shall be limited to the operation and maintenance of the public works project, and no court shall have jurisdiction to enter any order or decree requiring or permitting the receiver to sell, mortgage, or otherwise dispose of any such assets.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 3-14.

9-21-315. Surrender of possession by receiver.

Whenever all that is due upon the revenue bonds, and interest thereon, and upon any other obligations, and interest thereon, having a charge, lien, or encumbrance on the revenues of the public works project and under any of the terms of any covenants or agreements with bondholders shall have been paid or deposited as provided herein, and all defaults shall have been cured and made good, the court may in its discretion, and after such notice and hearing as it deems reasonable and proper, direct the receiver to surrender possession of the public works project to the local government. Upon any subsequent default, the holders of the revenue bonds shall have the same right to secure the appointment of a receiver as provided in this part.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 3-15.

9-21-316. Remedies cumulative — Effect of abandonment or nonexercise of right or remedy.

No remedy conferred by this part upon any holder of revenue bonds, or any trustee therefor, is intended to be exclusive of any other remedy, but each remedy is cumulative and in addition to every other remedy and may be exercised without exhausting and without regard to any other remedy conferred by this chapter or by any other law. No waiver of any default or breach of duty or contract, whether by any holder of bonds, or any trustee therefor, shall extend to or shall affect any subsequent default or breach of duty or contract or shall impair any rights or remedies thereon. No delay or omission of any revenue bondholder or any trustee therefor to exercise any right or power accruing upon any default shall impair any such right or power or shall be construed to be a waiver of any such default. Every substantive right and every remedy, conferred upon the holders of revenue bonds, may be enforced and exercised from time to time and as often as may be deemed expedient. In case any suit, action or proceeding to enforce any right or exercise any remedy shall be brought or taken and then discontinued or abandoned, or shall be determined adversely to the holder of the revenue bonds, or any trustee therefor, then and in every such case the local government and such holder, or such trustee, shall be restored to their former positions and rights and remedies as if no such suit, action or proceeding had been brought or taken. Nothing herein shall be construed as denying to any such suit or decree rendered therein such force as it would otherwise have by virtue of the legal doctrine of res judicata.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 3-16.